Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.500

Educational agencies offering vocational education programs—Local advisory committees—Advice on current job needs.

(1) Each local education agency or college district offering vocational educational programs shall establish local advisory committees to provide that agency or district with advice on current job needs and on the courses necessary to meet these needs.

(2) The local program committees shall:

(a) Participate in the determination of program goals;

(b) Review and evaluate program curricula, equipment, and effectiveness;

(c) Include representatives of business and labor who reflect the local industry, and the community; and

(d) Actively consult with other representatives of business, industry, labor, and agriculture.

[ 1991 c 238 s 76.]

NOTES: